District of Columbia statutes.
42-2502

Establishment.

There is established within the District of Columbia Department of Housing and Community Development a District of Columbia Government Employer-Assisted Housing Program to assist District of Columbia government employees to become homeowners in the District. The Program shall include:

(1)

A District contribution toward a down payment;

(2)

A deferred payment loan of up to $10,000; and

(3)

Agency single-family mortgage financing for qualified applicants.

History

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-96, § 3, 47 DCR 1081
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 7011, 57 DCR 181

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-2501.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-111 substituted “There” for “Subject to availability of funds, there”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 3 of the Government Employer-Assisted Housing Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-188, December 1, 1999, 46 DCR 10407).
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 3 of the Government Employer-Assisted Housing Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-258, February 9, 2000, 47 DCR 1124).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 7011 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 7011 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).